New Jersey, session 222, S2135.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A public entity shall not use a foreign-made small, unmanned aircraft system for any purpose. b.  As used in this section: "Foreign country" means any nation other than the United States, including, without limitation, any subdivision, territory, trust territory, dependency, or possession of any such nation. Foreign-made means any small, unmanned aircraft system in which the cost of component parts manufactured in a foreign country exceeds 25 percent of the cost of all components. Public entity means the State, or a political subdivision of the State, including municipalities, counties, and any board, bureau, office, instrumentality within or created by such department, any independent State authority, commission, instrumentality or agency, and, to the extent consistent with law, any interstate agency to which New Jersey is a party. Small, unmanned aircraft system means an unmanned, powered aircraft that is operated with the possibility of direct human intervention from within the aircraft; can be expendable or recoverable, and weighs less than fifty-five pounds including the weight of anything attached, carried to, or carried by the aircraft. 2.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month next following enactment, except that State agencies may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.